Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202153-103.48
Farmers market, defined.

Farmers market means any common facility or area where producers or growers gather on a regular, recurring basis to sell fruits, vegetables, meats, and other farm products directly to consumers.

Laws 2021, LB274, § 3.
May 26, 2021